Maryland, session 2025, HB0828.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–343.
(a) In this section and §§ 19–344, 19–345, 19–345.1, 19–345.2, and 19–345.3 of
this subtitle, “facility” means a related institution that, under the rules and regulations of
the Department, is a comprehensive care facility or an extended care facility.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0828*

HOUSE BILL 828
(b) (1) The General Assembly intends to promote the interests and well–being
of each resident of a facility.
(2) It is the policy of this State that, in addition to any other rights, each
resident of a facility has the following basic rights:
(i) The right to be treated with consideration, respect, and full
recognition of human dignity and individuality;
(ii) The right to receive treatment, care, and services that are
adequate, appropriate, and in compliance with relevant State and federal laws, rules, and
regulations;
(iii) The right to privacy;
(iv) The right to be free from mental and physical abuse;
(v) The right to notice, procedural fairness, and humane treatment
when being transferred or discharged from a facility;
(vi) The right to participate in decision making regarding transitions
in care, including a transfer or discharge from a facility;
(vii) The right to expect and receive appropriate assessment,
management, and treatment of pain as an integral component of the patient’s care;
(viii) The right to be free from physical and chemical restraints, except
for [restraints]:
1. RESTRAINTS that a physician authorizes for a clearly
indicated medical need; OR
2. SEDATIVES, ANTI–ANXIETY MEDICATION, A BED RAIL,
OR A GERI CHAIR ORDERED OR AUTHORIZED BY A PRESCRIBER, AND USED IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THE ORDER, FOR A PATIENT RECEIVING HOSPICE CARE;
(ix) The right to receive respect and privacy in a medical care
program; and
(x) The right to manage personal financial affairs.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.